Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the terms used in this chapter take their meanings as follows:

(1) "Board" means the optometry board;

(2) "License" means a certificate or permit to practice optometry as provided in *RCW 18.53.020 as amended from time to time;

(3) "Members" means members of the optometry board.

[ 1963 c 25 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 18.53.020 was repealed by 1986 c 259 s 85.